Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.207

Persons acquitted of sex offense due to insanity—Release of information authorized.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

In addition to any other information required to be released under this chapter, the department is authorized, pursuant to RCW 4.24.550, to release relevant information necessary to protect the public concerning a person who was acquitted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 due to insanity and was subsequently committed to the department pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1990 c 3 s 105.]

NOTES: